Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-25] Regional system
board; community hospitals; community health centers; collaboration. Each
regional system board and each community hospital under the jurisdiction of the
corporation shall collaborate with community health centers within their
respective geographic jurisdictions to maximize funding from the state and
federal governments to:

(1) Maximize reimbursement for health care services
provided;

(2) Acquire funds for capital investment;

(3) Provide expanded hours of service; and

(4) Ensure the provision of the appropriate level of
care to the community served by each community health center. [L 2009, c 182,
pt of §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next